Illinois, session 104th, HB2712.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Public Utilities Act is amended by changing 5Sections 9-210.5 as follows: 6    (220 ILCS 5/9-210.5)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on June 1, 2028)8    Sec. 9-210.5. Valuation of water and sewer utilities. 9    (a) In this Section:10        "Disinterested" means that the person directly 11    involved (1) is not a director, officer, or an employee of 12    the large public utility or the water or sewer utility or 13    its direct affiliates or subsidiaries for at least 12 14    months before becoming engaged under this Section; (2) 15    shall not derive a material financial benefit from the 16    sale of the water or sewer utility other than fees for 17    services rendered, and (3) shall not have a member of the 18    person's immediate family, including a spouse, parents or 19    spouse's parents, children or spouses of children, or 20    siblings and their spouses or children, be a director, 21    officer, or employee of either the large public utility or 22    water or sewer utility or the water or sewer utility or its 23    direct affiliates or subsidiaries for at least 12 months   HB2712- 2 -LRB104 10288 AAS 20362 b1    before becoming engaged under this Section or receive a 2    material financial benefit from the sale of the water or 3    sewer utility other than fees for services rendered.4        "District" means a service area of a large public 5    utility whose customers are subject to the same rate 6    tariff.7        "Large public utility" means an investor-owned public 8    utility that:9            (1) is subject to regulation by the Illinois 10        Commerce Commission under this Act;11            (2) regularly provides water or sewer service to 12        more than 15,000 customer connections;13            (3) provides safe and adequate service; and14            (4) is not a water or sewer utility as defined in 15        this subsection (a).16        "Next rate case" means a large public utility's first 17    general rate case after the date the large public utility 18    acquires the water or sewer utility where the acquired 19    water or sewer utility's cost of service is considered as 20    part of determining the large public utility's resulting 21    rates.22        "Prior rate case" means a large public utility's 23    general rate case resulting in the rates in effect for the 24    large public utility at the time it acquires the water or 25    sewer utility.26        "Utility service source" means the water or sewer   HB2712- 3 -LRB104 10288 AAS 20362 b1    utility or large public utility from which the customer 2    receives its utility service type.3        "Utility service type" means water utility service or 4    sewer utility service or water and sewer utility service.5        "Water or sewer utility" means any of the following:6            (1) a public utility that regularly provides water 7        or sewer service to 6,000 or fewer customer 8        connections;9            (2) a water district, including, but not limited 10        to, a public water district, water service district, 11        or surface water protection district, or a sewer 12        district of any kind established as a special district 13        under the laws of this State that regularly provides 14        water or sewer service;15            (3) a waterworks system or sewerage system 16        established under the Township Code that regularly 17        provides water or sewer service; or18            (4) a water system or sewer system owned by a 19        municipality that regularly provides water or sewer 20        service; and21            (5) any other entity that is not a public utility 22        that regularly provides water or sewer service.23    (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act, a 24large public utility that acquires a water or sewer utility 25may request that the Commission use, and, if so requested, the 26Commission shall use, the procedures set forth under this   HB2712- 4 -LRB104 10288 AAS 20362 b1Section to establish the ratemaking rate base of that water or 2sewer utility at the time when it is acquired by the large 3public utility.4    (c) If a large public utility elects the procedures under 5this Section to establish the rate base of a water or sewer 6utility that it is acquiring, then 3 appraisals shall be 7performed. The average of these 3 appraisals shall represent 8the fair market value of the water or sewer utility that is 9being acquired. The appraisals shall be performed by 3 10appraisers approved by the Commission's Executive Director or 11designee and engaged by either the water or sewer utility 12being acquired or by the large public utility. Each appraiser 13shall be engaged on reasonable terms approved by the 14Commission. Each appraiser shall be a disinterested person 15licensed as a State certified general real estate appraiser 16under the Real Estate Appraiser Licensing Act of 2002.17    Each appraiser shall:18        (1) be sworn to determine the fair market value of the 19    water or sewer utility by establishing the amount for 20    which the water or sewer utility would be sold in a 21    voluntary transaction between a willing buyer and willing 22    seller under no obligation to buy or sell;23        (2) determine fair market value in compliance with the 24    Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice;25        (3) engage one disinterested engineer who is licensed 26    in this State, and who may be the same engineer that is   HB2712- 5 -LRB104 10288 AAS 20362 b1    engaged by the other appraisers, to prepare an assessment 2    of the tangible assets of the water or sewer utility, 3    which is to be incorporated into the appraisal under the 4    cost approach;5        (4) request from the manager of the Accounting 6    Department, if the water or sewer utility is a public 7    utility that is regulated by the Commission, a list of 8    investments made by the water or sewer utility that had 9    been disallowed previously and that shall be excluded from 10    the calculation of the large public utility's rate base in 11    its next rate case; and 12        (5) return their appraisal, in writing, to the water 13    or sewer utility and large public utility in a reasonable 14    and timely manner.15    If the appraiser cannot engage an engineer, as described 16in paragraph (3) of this subsection (c), within 30 days after 17the appraiser is engaged, then the Commission's Executive 18Director or designee shall recommend the engineer the 19appraiser should engage. The Commission's Executive Director 20or designee shall provide his or her recommendation within 30 21days after he or she is officially notified of the appraiser's 22failure to engage an engineer and the appraiser shall promptly 23work to engage the recommended engineer. If the appraiser is 24unable to negotiate reasonable engagement terms with the 25recommended engineer within 15 days after the recommendation 26by the Commission's Executive Director or designee, then the   HB2712- 6 -LRB104 10288 AAS 20362 b1appraiser shall notify the Commission's Executive Director or 2designee and the process shall be repeated until an engineer 3is successfully engaged.4    (d) Twenty percent of the The lesser of (i) the purchase 5price or (ii) the fair market value determined under 6subsection (c) of this Section shall constitute the rate base 7associated with the water or sewer utility as acquired by and 8incorporated into the rate base of the district designated by 9the acquiring large public utility under this Section, subject 10to any adjustments that the Commission deems necessary to 11ensure such rate base reflects prudent and useful investments 12in the provision of public utility service. The difference 13between the rate base and the purchase price or fair market 14value shall be borne by the shareholders of the acquiring 15large public utility. The reasonable transaction and closing 16costs incurred by the large public utility shall be treated 17consistent with the applicable accounting standards under this 18Act. The total amount of all of the appraisers' fees to be 19included in the transaction and closing costs shall not exceed 20the greater of $15,000 or 5% of the appraised value of the 21water or sewer utility being acquired. This rate base 22treatment shall not be deemed to violate this Act, including, 23but not limited to, any Sections in Articles VIII and IX of 24this Act that might be affected by this Section, provided that 25only 20% of the transaction and closing costs are included in 26the rate base. Any acquisition of a water or sewer utility that   HB2712- 7 -LRB104 10288 AAS 20362 b1affects the cumulative base rates of the large public 2utility's existing ratepayers in the tariff group into which 3the water or sewer utility is to be combined by less than (1) 42.5% at the time of the acquisition for any single acquisition 5completed under this Section or (2) 5% for all acquisitions 6completed under this Section before the Commission's final 7order in the next rate case shall not be deemed to violate 8Section 7-204 or any other provision of this Act.9    In the Commission's order that approves the large public 10utility's acquisition of the water or sewer utility, the 11Commission shall issue its decision establishing (1) the 12ratemaking rate base of the water or sewer utility; (2) the 13district or tariff group with which the water or sewer utility 14shall be combined for ratemaking purposes, if such combination 15has been proposed by the large public utility; and (3) the 16rates to be charged to customers in the water or sewer utility.17    (e) If the water or sewer utility being acquired is owned 18by the State or any political subdivision thereof, then the 19water or sewer utility must inform the public of the terms of 20its acquisition by the large public utility by (1) holding a 21public meeting prior to the acquisition and (2) causing to be 22published, in a newspaper of general circulation in the area 23that the water or sewer utility operates, a notice setting 24forth the terms of its acquisition by the large public utility 25and options that shall be available to assist customers to pay 26their bills after the acquisition.   HB2712- 8 -LRB104 10288 AAS 20362 b1    At the next election following the public meeting and 2notice required by this subsection, a referendum, subject to 3the requirements of Section 16-7 of the Election Code, shall 4be placed on the ballot for all electors within the area the 5water or sewer utility operates in substantially the following 6form:7        May the (name of large public utility) acquire the 8    (name of water or sewer utility) under the terms of 9    acquisition published in (name of newspaper) on (date)?10    The votes shall be recorded as "Yes" or "No".11    If a majority of the electors voting on the referendum 12within the service area of the water or sewer utility vote in 13favor of the referendum, then the acquisition may continue as 14provided in this Section. If less than a majority of the 15electors voting on the referendum within the service area of 16the water or sewer utility vote in favor of the referendum, the 17Commission shall not approve the large public utility's 18acquisition of the water or sewer utility. 19    (f) The large public utility may recommend the district or 20tariff group of which the water or sewer utility shall, for 21ratemaking purposes, become a part after the acquisition, or 22may recommend a lesser rate for the water or sewer utility. If 23the large public utility recommends a lesser rate, it shall 24submit to the Commission its proposed rate schedule and the 25proposed final tariff group for the acquired water or sewer 26utility. The Commission's approved district or tariff group or   HB2712- 9 -LRB104 10288 AAS 20362 b1rates shall be consistent with the large public utility's 2recommendation, unless such recommendation can be shown to be 3contrary to the public interest.4    (g) From the date of acquisition until the date that new 5rates are effective in the acquiring large public utility's 6next rate case, the customers of the acquired water or sewer 7utility shall pay the approved then-existing rates of the 8district or tariff group as ordered by the Commission, or some 9lesser rates as recommended by the large public utility and 10approved by the Commission under subsection (f); provided, 11that, if the application of such rates of the large public 12utility to customers of the acquired water or sewer utility 13using 54,000 gallons annually results in an increase to the 14total annual bill of customers of the acquired water or sewer 15utility, exclusive of fire service or related charges, then 16the large public utility's rates charged to the customers of 17the acquired water or sewer utility shall be uniformly 18reduced, if any reduction is required, by the percent that 19results in the total annual bill, exclusive of fire services 20or related charges, for the customers of the acquired water or 21sewer utility using 54,000 gallons being equal to 1.5% of the 22latest median household income as reported by the United 23States Census Bureau for the most applicable community or 24county. For each customer of the water or sewer utility with 25potable water usage values that cannot be reasonably obtained, 26a value of 4,500 gallons per month shall be assigned. These   HB2712- 10 -LRB104 10288 AAS 20362 b1rates shall not be deemed to violate this Act including, but 2not limited to, Section 9-101 and any other applicable 3Sections in Articles VIII and IX of this Act. The Commission 4shall issue its decision establishing the rates effective for 5the water or sewer utility immediately following an 6acquisition in its order approving the acquisition.7    (h) In the acquiring large public utility's next rate 8case, the water or sewer utility and the district or tariff 9group ordered by the Commission and their costs of service may 10be combined under the same rate tariff. This rate tariff shall 11be based on allocation of costs of service of the acquired 12water or sewer utility and the large public utility's district 13or tariff group ordered by the Commission and utilizing a rate 14design that does not distinguish among customers on the basis 15of utility service source or type. This rate tariff shall not 16be deemed to violate this Act including, but not limited to, 17Section 9-101 of this Act. In the acquiring large public 18utility's 2 rate cases after an acquisition, but in no 19subsequent rate case, the large public utility may file a rate 20tariff for a water or sewer utility acquired under this 21Section that establishes lesser rates than the district or 22tariff group into which the water or sewer utility is to be 23combined. Those lesser rates shall not be deemed to violate 24Section 7-204 or any other provision of this Act if they affect 25the cumulative base rates of the large public utility's 26existing rate payers in the district or tariff by less than   HB2712- 11 -LRB104 10288 AAS 20362 b12.5%. 2    (i) Any post-acquisition improvements made by the large 3public utility in the water or sewer utility shall accrue a 4cost for financing set at the large public utility's 5determined rate for allowance for funds used during 6construction, inclusive of the debt, equity, and income tax 7gross up components, after the date on which the expenditure 8was incurred by the large public utility until the investment 9has been in service for a 4-year period or, if sooner, until 10the time the rates are implemented in the large public 11utility's next rate case.12    Any post-acquisition improvements made by the large public 13utility in the water or sewer utility shall not be depreciated 14for ratemaking purposes from the date on which the expenditure 15was incurred by the large public utility until the investment 16has been in service for a 4-year period or, if sooner, until 17the time the rates are implemented in the large public 18utility's next rate case.19    (j) This Section shall be exclusively applied to large 20public utilities in the voluntary and mutually agreeable 21acquisition of water or sewer utilities. Any petitions filed 22with the Commission related to the acquisitions described in 23this Section, including petitions seeking approvals or 24certificates required by this Act, shall be deemed approved 25unless the Commission issues its final order within 11 months 26after the date the large public utility filed its initial   HB2712- 12 -LRB104 10288 AAS 20362 b1petition. This Section shall only apply to utilities providing 2water or sewer service and shall not be construed in any manner 3to apply to electric corporations, natural gas corporations, 4or any other utility subject to this Act.5    (k) Nothing in this Section shall prohibit a party from 6declining to proceed with an acquisition or be deemed as 7establishing the final purchase price of an acquisition.8    (l) In the Commission's order that approves the large 9utility's acquisition of the water or sewer utility, the 10Commission shall address each aspect of the acquisition 11transaction for which approval is required under the Act. 12    (m) Any contractor or subcontractor that performs work on 13a water or sewer utility acquired by a large public utility 14under this Section shall be a responsible bidder as described 15in Section 30-22 of the Illinois Procurement Code. The 16contractor or subcontractor shall submit evidence of meeting 17the requirements to be a responsible bidder as described in 18Section 30-22 to the water or sewer utility. Any new water or 19sewer facility built as a result of the acquisition shall 20require the contractor to enter into a project labor 21agreement. The large public utility acquiring the water or 22sewer utility shall offer employee positions to qualified 23employees of the acquired water or sewer utility. 24    (n) This Section is repealed on June 1, 2028. 25(Source: P.A. 102-149, eff. 1-1-22.)